South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3321.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 11, Chapter 13, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-13-1115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an appointed state official who does not raise campaign funds is not required to file an annual statement of economic interest or a campaign disclosure form with a local governing body, a county, or with the State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----